Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2508
Allocation of funds for road purposes; Department of Transportation; State Treasurer; duties.

The Department of Transportation shall compute the amount allocated to each county or municipal county under each of the factors listed in section 39-2507 and shall then compute the total allocation to each such county or municipal county and transmit such information to the local governing board and the State Treasurer, who shall disburse funds accordingly.

Laws 1969, c. 315, § 8, p. 1136;

Laws 1985, LB 25, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 43;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 166.